data/lexd/80-variants.lexd
LEXICON Variants
aīns<Num><Neut><Pl><Nom>:aināi
aīns<Num><Neut><Pl><Acc>:aīnans
aīns<Num><Neut><Pl><Gen>:aīnan
aīns<Num><Neut><Pl><Dat>:ainammans
stas<Pron><Neut><Pl><Nom>:stāi
stas<Pron><Neut><Pl><Acc>:stans
stas<Pron><Neut><Pl><Gen>:stēisan
stas<Pron><Neut><Pl><Dat>:stēimans
stas<Pron><Neut><Sg><Nom>:stan
stas<Pron><Neut><Sg><Acc>:stan
kits<Pron><Neut><Pl><Nom>:kitāi
kits<Pron><Neut><Pl><Acc>:kittans
kits<Pron><Neut><Pl><Gen>:kitēisan
kits<Pron><Neut><Pl><Dat>:kitēimans
